Alabama, session 2026rs, SB342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-6J-10 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§16-6J-10
(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:
(1) The CHOOSE Act was enacted to expand educational
opportunity in Alabama and enhance the ability of Alabama
parents to choose the K-12 educational setting that best meets
the needs of their children.
(2) Recognizing the importance of interscholastic
athletics, the CHOOSE Act contains an athletic-eligibility
nondiscrimination provision that states, "Nothing in the
CHOOSE Act shall affect or change the athletic eligibility of
student athletes governed by the Alabama High School Athletic
Association or similar association."
(3) Interscholastic athletics are a vital part of a
Page 1

(3) Interscholastic athletics are a vital part of a
SB342 Enrolled
complete education, promoting teamwork, discipline,
leadership, personal growth, and community engagement.
Participation in interscholastic athletics, like participation
in other extracurricular activities, improves students'
academic performance, school engagement, and social outcomes.
(4) Denying CHOOSE Act participating students the
opportunity to participate in interscholastic athletics based
solely on his or her status as a CHOOSE Act participating
student undermines the CHOOSE Act's promise of meaningful
educational choice.
(5) It is essential to provide robust mechanisms to
enforce the CHOOSE Act's athletic-eligibility
nondiscrimination provision and otherwise ensure that a
student's CHOOSE Act status does not limit his or her ability
to participate in interscholastic athletics.
(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) CHOOSE ACT PARTICIPANT. A CHOOSE Act student, the
parent of such a student, or a participating school.
(2) CHOOSE ACT STUDENT. A participating student,
regardless of whether he or she has begun receiving services
from an education service provider.
(3) INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION. An
association that regulates interscholastic K-12 athletic
events, including the Alabama High School Athletic
Association, the Alabama Independent School Association, or
any similar association. The term also includes any of the
association's officers, agents, servants, employees, member
Page 2

association's officers, agents, servants, employees, member
SB342 Enrolled
institutions, and any other person working in concert with
them.
(c)(1) A CHOOSE Act participant may bring a civil
action against an interscholastic athletic association to
enjoin any of the following actions by an interscholastic
athletic association:
a. Adoption, enforcement, or implementation of a rule
or other policy or practice that limits or impedes
participation of a CHOOSE Act student in an athletic activity
when the determinative factor is his or her status as a CHOOSE
Act participating student. This paragraph does not preclude
rules, policies, or practices of an interscholastic athletic
association, including those governing academic eligibility,
transfers, or residency, that are applied without regard to
whether the student is a CHOOSE Act participating student.
b. Punishment of, or any adverse action against, a
CHOOSE Act participant for a CHOOSE Act student's
participation in an athletic activity pursuant to a court
order, even if the court order is later vacated, stayed,
reversed, or found to lack justification, if the court order
was issued pursuant to paragraph a. or to enforce the
prohibition in Section 16-6J-3(i) prohibiting discrimination
against CHOOSE Act students with respect to athletic
eligibility.
c. Retaliation against a CHOOSE Act participant for
advocacy or support of a CHOOSE Act student's participation in
an athletic activity pursuant to paragraph a. or Section
16-6J-3(i).
Page 3

16-6J-3(i).
SB342 Enrolled
(2) The following rules shall govern an action for
injunctive relief brought pursuant to this subsection:
a. The CHOOSE Act participant may seek a temporary
restraining order, preliminary injunction, permanent
injunction, or any combination thereof, pursuant to the
principles of equity governing such forms of relief, provided
a court shall prioritize allowing participation in an athletic
activity by a CHOOSE Act student over preservation of the
status quo.
b. Upon presenting sufficient evidence that an
interscholastic athletic association has taken or will likely
take an action enumerated in subdivision (1), a CHOOSE Act
participant shall be conclusively presumed to have established
irreparable harm, that the CHOOSE Act participant has no
adequate remedy at law, and that the requested injunction
100 would serve the public interest.
101 c. Upon presenting sufficient evidence that an
102 interscholastic athletic association has taken or will likely
103 take an action enumerated in subdivision (1), a CHOOSE Act
104 participant shall be presumed to have established that the
105 balance of the hardships favors issuance of an injunction
106 unless the interscholastic athletic association establishes
107 otherwise by clear and convincing evidence.
108 (3) Under this subsection, a court may award relief
109 regardless of when the action described in subdivision (1) was
110 taken by the interscholastic athletic association.
111 (d) In addition to any relief sought pursuant to
112 subsection (c), a CHOOSE Act participant may bring a civil
Page 4

subsection (c), a CHOOSE Act participant may bring a civil
SB342 Enrolled
113 action against an interscholastic athletic association to
114 recover the CHOOSE Act participant's actual economic damages
115 proximately caused by any action enumerated in subdivision
116 (c)(1) taken by the interscholastic athletic association,
117 provided such civil action shall be brought within two years
118 from the date of the action at issue.
119 (e) Venue for an action brought pursuant to this
120 section shall be proper in the circuit court of the county in
121 which the CHOOSE Act participant resides, attends school,
122 operates a school, or in the Circuit Court of Montgomery
123 County.
124 (f) In an action brought pursuant to this section, the
125 court may award costs and reasonable attorney fees to a
126 prevailing CHOOSE Act participant. The court may award costs
127 and reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing interscholastic
128 athletic association as provided in the Alabama Litigation
129 Accountability Act.
130 Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 5

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB342 Enrolled
131
132
133
134
135
136
137 ________________________________________________
138 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
139
140
141
142 ________________________________________________
143 Speaker of the House of Representatives
144
145
146 SB342
147 Senate 31-Mar-26
148 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
149 the Senate, as amended.
150
151 Patrick Harris,
152 Secretary.
153
154
155
156
157 House of Representatives
158 Passed: 09-Apr-26
159
160
161
162
163 By: Senator Chambliss
Page 6